Louisiana, session 2026, HB1105.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 2997(introductory paragraph) and (7) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 2997. Express authority required
Authority shall also must be given expressly to:
* * *
(7) Prevent or limit reasonable communication, visitation, or interaction
between the principal and a relative by blood, adoption, or affinity within the third
degree, or another individual who has a relationship based on or productive of strong
affection.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2738 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1105